District of Columbia statutes.
3-1204.12

Collaborative practice agreements; expansion.

In addition to the authority granted by this chapter to physicians and pharmacists to enter into collaborative practice agreements, the Mayor may authorize, in consultation with the relevant health occupation board, through rulemaking, additional licensed health practitioners to enter into collaborative practice agreements with pharmacists.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 412
as added Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-185, § 2(c), 59 DCR 9454
This section is referenced in § 3-1202.08.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-185 added this section.